Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.63.152

Public notice—Identification of affected property.

Any notice made under chapter 35A.63 RCW that identifies affected property may identify this affected property without using a legal description of the property including, but not limited to, identification by an address, written description, vicinity sketch, or other reasonable means.

[ 1988 c 168 s 10.]